Arkansas statutes. Title 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 7

Excise Taxes

Publisher's Notes.

The tax collection procedures of this chapter may be superseded by the Arkansas Tax Procedure Act, §26-18-101 et seq.

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

Effective Dates.

Acts 1935, No. 109, § 15: approved Mar. 16, 1935. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, the present state revenue does not meet the needs for maintenance and development of the State Government, and its agencies and the state's credit is threatened with impairment, an emergency is declared to exist and this Act shall become a law and be effective on its passage and approval or nonaction by the Governor.”

Acts 1941, No. 356, § 7: Mar. 26, 1941. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, it has been ascertained that large quantities of ‘moonshine’ intoxicating liquors are being manufactured and sold in the State of Arkansas and large quantities of intoxicating liquors upon which the state tax has not been paid are also being sold in the State of Arkansas and the state is losing great sums of money in the form of revenue by reason thereof, an emergency is hereby declared and this act shall be in full force and effect immediately from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1947, No. 108, § 5: approved Feb. 22, 1947. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and is hereby declared by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that existing laws providing for the distribution of state revenues are such that a moderate diminution of certain of the revenues would have the effect of curtailing the activities of certain necessary agencies of the State Government, and that only the provisions of this act will correct a situation which otherwise may deprive the citizens of this state from receiving the benefits which the operation of the State Government contemplates. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1949, No. 282, § 17: Mar. 18, 1949. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, there is at this time discrimination between wholesale and retail dealers and among themselves; and whereas, such discriminatory practices are detrimental to the welfare of the state, and it being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1969, No. 169, § 5: Mar. 5, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “The General Assembly finds that the State of Arkansas is in immediate need of additional funds for general revenue purposes. Accordingly, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public health, peace, and safety shall be effective from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1969, No. 271, § 7: Mar. 18, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the alcoholic beverage laws of this state are not being adequately enforced; that there is a pressing need for additional personnel for the proper enforcement of these laws; and that only by the immediate passage of this act can the additional revenues be raised to employ the necessary additional personnel to properly enforce the alcoholic beverage laws of this state. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective from and after the passage and approval of this act.”

Acts 1971, No. 585, § 34: approved Apr. 6, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and is hereby declared by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that in order to establish an orderly procedure which will insure the monthly and quarterly distribution of funds for the necessary services and operations of the state government, as provided for in this act, it is necessary that the provisions of this act become effective immediately; that under the provisions of this act seriously needed improvements for many of our public institutions are contemplated, and only the provisions of this act will provide such funds which will be adequate to alleviate this situation; and that only the provisions of this act will correct many of our financial difficulties, and which otherwise may deprive the citizens of this state from receiving the benefits for which the operation of state government contemplates. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1983, No. 826, § 5: July 1, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that tax stamps are now required for malt liquor, causing an undue burden on taxpayers, and unnecessary expense for the administration of the malt liquor tax by the State of Arkansas, and the passage of this act is necessary to provide for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1983.”

Acts 1983, No. 844, § 7: May 1, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and is hereby declared by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the collection of state general revenues during the current fiscal year has diminished to such extent that the activities of certain necessary agencies of the state government are being and will continue to be curtailed, and that the provisions of this act will aid in the correction of a situation which otherwise will deprive the citizens of this state from receiving benefits which the operation of state government contemplates. Therefore, this act being necessary for the preservation of the public health and safety shall take effect and be in full force effective May 1, 1983.”

Acts 1987, No. 424, § 10: July 1, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the State of Arkansas is in serious danger of losing revenues which are necessary to provide adequate funding for schools and other essential services required by the citizens of this state and the provisions of this act are necessary to avoid a substantial reduction in state revenues. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 1987.”

Acts 1995, No. 537, § 15: July 1, 1995.

Acts 1995, No. 537, § 16: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that present law does not adequately protect the people of the State of Arkansas from unscrupulous activities of nonresident manufacturers, suppliers, brewers and importers of beer; that the present law does not contain procedures for registration of nonresident manufacturers, suppliers, brewers and importers of beer, nor enforcement of current laws against such groups; and that the present law does not empower the Alcoholic Beverage Division to effectively monitor the activities of manufacturers, suppliers, brewers and importers of beer. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 2007, No. 1203, § 2: Apr. 4, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that beer and malt beverage manufacturers and wholesalers are an important component of the state economy; that in order to be competitive, beer and malt beverage manufacturers are in urgent need of immediate tax relief; that failure to provide immediate tax relief to beer and malt beverage manufacturers could cause irreparable harm to these manufacturers and the state economy; and that this act is immediately necessary to enable the manufacturers to continue operations and contribute to the state economy. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on the first day of the calendar month after: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2009, No. 294, § 30: Mar. 3, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that on-premises consumption outlets in the State of Arkansas are not able to compete on an equal and similar basis with outlets located in states surrounding the State of Arkansas; that the State of Arkansas is in need of additional revenues; that only minor adjustments to the violation fine schedule have been made since its passage in 1981; and that this act is immediately necessary to raise additional revenues and to better address violations committed by Alcoholic Beverage Control Division permit holders. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2015, No. 857, § 12: Mar. 31, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act is essential to the public interest and operation of the alcohol laws in the State of Arkansas; that this act eliminates conflicting language and allows consistent application of alcohol laws; that this act is immediately necessary due to the substantial growth and continued expansion of the brewing industry in Arkansas; that clear and consistent application of the law to the brewing industry is in the public’s immediate interest as is controlling the distribution of alcoholic beverages within the state. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2017, No. 671, § 2: Sept. 1, 2017. Effective date clause provided: “Section 1 of this act becomes effective on the first day of the first month following the effective date of this act.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

3-7-101. Purpose.

It is declared not to be the purpose of §§3-7-101 —3-7-104 and3-7-106 —3-7-110 to impose a duplicate or double license tax on the manufacturing, selling, blending, rectifying, or mixing in this state, or transporting in this state of spirituous liquors, vinous liquors, wines other than Arkansas wines, or beer or malt beverages, as measured by the quantity of spirituous liquors, vinous liquors, wines other than Arkansas wines, or beer or malt beverages, manufactured, sold, blended, rectified, mixed, or transported in or into this state in conformity thereto, and any other license tax imposed by law heretofore passed is declared to be a privilege tax or permit fee.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 109, § 7; Pope's Dig., § 14179; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-405.

3-7-102. Definition.

As used in §§3-7-101 —3-7-104 and3-7-106 —3-7-110, unless the context otherwise requires, “person” means every corporation, association, copartnership, limited liability company, or individual.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 109, § 1; Pope's Dig., § 14173; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-401; Acts 1995, No. 1160, § 23.

3-7-103. Penalty — Revocation.

Any person who shall violate any of the provisions of §§3-7-101 —3-7-104 and3-7-106 —3-7-110 shall be guilty of a violation and upon conviction be fined not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

History.

Acts 1935, No. 109, § 11; Pope's Dig., § 14183; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-409; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 32.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment substituted “violation” for “misdemeanor”.

Cross References.

Penalty for selling, transporting, or possessing untaxed liquor, §3-3-216.

Revocation procedure generally, §§3-2-212 —3-2-217.

3-7-104. Rate of tax.

There is levied and there shall be collected as provided by law and rule the following taxes:

(1)(A)

A tax at the rate of two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50) on each gallon of spirituous liquor sold or offered for sale in the State of Arkansas.

(B)

“Spirituous liquor”, as used in this section, means liquor distilled from the fermented juices of grain, fruits, or vegetables and any mixture containing liquor distilled from the fermented juices of grain, fruits, or vegetables, with an alcoholic content of twenty-one percent (21%) or more alcohol by weight;

(2)(A)

A tax at the rate of one dollar ($1.00) on each gallon of premixed spirituous liquor sold or offered for sale in the State of Arkansas.

(B)(i)

“Premixed spirituous liquor”, as used in this section, means liquor distilled from the fermented juices of grain, fruits, or vegetables, having an alcoholic content of less than twenty-one percent (21%) alcohol by weight but more than five percent (5%) alcohol by weight.

(ii)

“Premixed spirituous liquor”, as used in this section, does not mean hard cider;

(3)(A)

A tax at the rate of fifty cents (50¢) on each gallon of light spirituous liquor sold or offered for sale in the State of Arkansas.

(B)(i)

“Light spirituous liquor”, as used in this section, means liquor distilled from the fermented juices of grain, fruits, or vegetables and any mixture containing liquor distilled from the fermented juices of grain, fruits, or vegetables, having an alcoholic content between one-half of one percent (0.5%) and five percent (5%) alcohol by weight.

(ii)

“Light spirituous liquor”, as used in this section, does not mean hard cider;

(4)(A)

A tax at the rate of seventy-five cents (75¢) on each gallon of vinous liquor, except wines fermented and manufactured within the State of Arkansas from grapes, berries, or other fruits grown in Arkansas sold or offered for sale in the State of Arkansas.

(B)(i)

“Vinous liquor”, as used in this section, means the fermented juices of grapes, berries, or other fruits and any other mixture containing the fermented juices of grapes, berries, or other fruits, having an alcoholic content of more than five percent (5%) alcohol by weight.

(ii)

“Vinous liquor”, as used in this section, does not mean hard cider;

(5)(A)

A tax at the rate of twenty-five cents (25¢) on each gallon of light wine except light wine fermented and manufactured within the State of Arkansas from grapes, berries, or other fruits grown in Arkansas, as sold or offered for sale in the State of Arkansas.

(B)(i)

“Light wine”, as used in this section, means the fermented juices of grapes, berries, or fruits and any other mixture containing the fermented juices of grapes, berries, or fruits, having an alcoholic content of between one-half of one percent (0.5%) and five percent (5%) alcohol by weight.

(ii)

“Light wine”, as used in this section, does not mean hard cider;

(6)(A)

A tax at the rate of seven dollars and fifty cents ($7.50) per barrel of thirty-two gallons (32 gals.), and proportionately for larger and smaller gallonages per barrel, on all beer having an alcoholic content of five percent (5%) or less by weight and hard cider sold or offered for sale in the State of Arkansas.

(B)

This tax shall be paid in the manner prescribed by §3-7-401 et seq.; and

(7)

A tax at the rate of twenty cents (20¢) on each gallon of malt liquor sold or offered for sale in the State of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 109, § 3, as added by Acts 1947, No. 108, § 1; 1959, No. 113, § 1; 1963, No. 196, § 1; 1969, No. 169, § 1; 1983, No. 826, § 1; 1983, No. 844, §§ 3-5; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-402, 48-402n; Acts 1987, No. 424, §§ 1-3; 1993, No. 403, § 1; 2017, No. 671, § 1.

Publisher's Notes.

This section formerly required the affixation of tax stamps to spirituous, vinous, and malt liquors. Acts 1983, No. 826, § 1, deleted that requirement in its entirety, while § 2 of the same act specifically provided that on and after July 1, 1983, the purchase and affixation of tax stamps would no longer be required for malt liquors under Acts 1935, No. 109.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment substituted “rule” for “regulation” following “law and” in the introductory language; added (2)(B)(ii), (3)(B)(ii), (4)(B)(ii) and (5)(B)(ii); deleted “as authorized by §§3-5-401 —3-5-412 [repealed]” preceding “sold or offered” in (4)(A); deleted “authorized by §§3-5-401 —3-5-412 [repealed]” preceding “sold or offered” in (5)(A); and inserted “and hard cider” in (6)(A).

Cross References.

Native brewery, exemption from tax, §3-5-1408.

3-7-105. Malt liquor tax — Reporting and payments.

(a)

The excise tax levied on malt liquors by §3-7-104 shall be reported and paid to the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration on or before the fifteenth day of the month following the month in which the wholesaler or other person authorized to sell malt liquors obtains delivery of such malt liquors from the supplier.

(b)

The secretary shall provide forms necessary for reporting the tax due and shall enforce the tax pursuant to the Arkansas Tax Procedure Act, §26-18-101 et seq.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 826, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-402.2; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 3331.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “secretary” for “director” in (a) and (b).

3-7-106. Shipping permits.

(a)(1)

It shall be unlawful for any person to ship or transport or cause to be shipped or transported into the State of Arkansas any spirituous liquors, vinous liquors, wines other than Arkansas wines, or beer or malt beverages from points without the state without first having obtained a permit from the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division.

(2)

A railroad company, express company, or bonded truck company or truck line operating under a certificate or permit issued by the Arkansas Department of Transportation, or a river transportation company shall not receive for shipment or ship into this state any package or receptacle containing distilled spirits unless a copy of the permit showing that payment of the taxes required by law has been made accompanies the shipment.

(3)

The permit shall be in such form as may be prescribed by the director, and all such shipments into the state shall be governed by such rules as may be promulgated by the director.

(4)

However, the railroad or express company or river transportation company shall not be required to obtain any permit to transport distilled spirits but shall be subject to all rules promulgated by the director.

(b)(1)

It shall be unlawful for any person who is permitted by law to manufacture, sell, or transport spirituous liquors, vinous liquors, wines other than Arkansas wines, or beer or malt beverages to transport or cause spirituous liquors, vinous liquors, wines other than Arkansas wines, or beer or malt beverages to be transported by any means of transportation except as may be prescribed by the rules of the director.

(2)

However, spirits may be transported by truck or wagon from and to freight or express depots, to and from the place or places of business of the permittees and upon the premises of the permittees, from and to one (1) place of business to another place of business of the permittee, provided that the owner of trucks or wagons transporting distilled liquor as aforesaid, excepting trucks and wagons owned and operated by a railroad or express company, or bonded truck company or truck line operating under a certificate or permit issued by the Arkansas Department of Transportation, or a river transportation company, or by the person permitted by law to manufacture, sell, or transport spirituous liquors, vinous liquors, wines other than Arkansas wines, or beer or malt beverages shall procure a permit to engage in transportation and shall execute a bond satisfactory in amount, form, and as to surety, to be approved by the director, conditioned upon the lawful transportation of spirituous liquors, vinous liquors, wines other than Arkansas wines, or beer or malt beverages.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 109, § 5; Pope's Dig., § 14177; Acts 1941, No. 356, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-404; Acts 2017, No. 707 §§ 1, 2; 2019, No. 315, §§ 85, 86.

Publisher's Notes.

As to regulations requiring reports rather than transportation permits for beer, see §3-7-401.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment substituted “Department of Transportation” for “State Highway and Transportation Department” in (a)(2) and (b)(2); and made stylistic changes in (a)(2).

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a)(3), (a)(4), and (b)(1).

Cross References.

Reports in lieu of permits, §3-7-401.

Spirituous, vinous, and malt liquors defined, §3-1-102.

3-7-107. Enforcement of rules.

(a)

Sections 3-7-101 — 3-7-104 and 3-7-106 — 3-7-110 shall be administered and enforced by the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division and the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration.

(b)

The Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division and the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration are authorized and directed to issue permits as provided for in §§3-7-101 —3-7-104 and3-7-106 —3-7-110, for the manufacture, sale, and transportation of distilled spirits and to enforce the license tax provisions of §§3-7-101 —3-7-104 and3-7-106 —3-7-110 and the collection of the license taxes imposed hereby and to promulgate reasonable rules for those purposes.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 109, § 8; Pope's Dig., § 14180; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-406; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 87; 2019, No. 910, § 3332.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Secretary” for “Director” in (a) and (b).

3-7-108. Disposition of funds.

All taxes, penalties, and costs collected by the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration under the provisions of §§3-7-101 —3-7-104 and3-7-106 —3-7-110 shall be general revenues and shall be deposited into the State Treasury to the credit of the State Apportionment Fund. The Treasurer of State, on or before the fifth day of the month next following the month during which such funds shall have been received by him or her, shall allocate and transfer the funds to the various State Treasury funds in the proportions to each as provided by law, after first transferring to the General Revenue Fund Account of the State Apportionment Fund an amount equivalent to the cost of collection and other charges as also provided by law.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 109, § 9, as added by 1947, No. 108, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-407; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 3333.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary” for “Director” in the first sentence; and inserted “Account” in the second sentence.

3-7-109. Delinquent taxes.

On the failure of any person, liable therefor, to pay the taxes imposed by §§3-7-101 —3-7-104 and3-7-106 —3-7-110 within fifteen (15) days after the taxes have become due, he or she shall be deemed delinquent. A penalty of twenty percent (20%) on the amount of license tax due shall attach. The Auditor of State shall at once cause proceedings to be instituted for the collection of the license tax, with such interest and penalties as may be provided by law for the collection of other taxes.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 109, § 10; Pope's Dig., § 14182; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-408.

3-7-110. Wrongful tax collections.

(a)

No suit shall be maintained in any court to restrain or delay the collection or payment of the tax levied by §§3-7-101 —3-7-104 and3-7-106 —3-7-110.

(b)

The aggrieved taxpayer shall pay with or without protest the tax as and when required and may at any time within two (2) years from the date of the payment sue the state through its agent, the Auditor of State, in an action at law in any state or federal court otherwise having jurisdiction of the parties and subject matter for the recovery of the tax paid with legal interest thereon from the date of payment.

(c)

If it is finally determined that the tax or any part thereof was wrongfully collected, for any reason, it shall be the duty of the Auditor of State to issue a warrant on the Treasurer of State for the amount of the tax so adjudged to have been wrongfully collected together with legal interest thereon. The Treasurer of State shall pay the warrant amount at once, in preference to other warrants or claims against the state.

(d)

A separate suit need not be filed for each individual payment made by any taxpayer, but a recovery may be had in one (1) suit for as many payments as may have been made.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 109, § 12; Pope's Dig., § 14184; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-410.

3-7-111. Additional taxes.

(a)(1)

In addition to all other fees and taxes now imposed by law, there are levied and shall be collected the following additional fees and taxes:

(A)

An additional tax of five cents (5¢) per case on each case of native wine produced and sold in this state, including light wines, wine coolers, and any other mixture containing the fermented juices of grapes, berries, fruits, or vegetables regardless of the percentage of alcoholic content, the tax to be paid by the manufacturer of the wine;

(B)

A consumer enforcement tax of twenty-five cents (25¢) per thirty-two-gallon barrel of beer that may be passed on by the retailer to the consumer or may be absorbed by the retailer, the tax to be collected by the beer wholesalers acting as agent for the state;

(C)

In addition to the fee imposed for the privilege of operating a dispensary under §3-4-604, an additional fee of four hundred fifty dollars ($450) for the issuance of each permit; and

(D)

In addition to the permit fee now imposed under §3-4-605 for the privilege of storing, transporting, and selling at wholesale spirituous, vinous, or malt liquors, an additional tax of nine thousand three hundred dollars ($9,300).

(2)

All additional permit fees and taxes imposed under subdivisions (a)(1)(B)-(D) of this section shall be levied and collected in the same manner as now provided by law.

(3)

The tax imposed by subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section shall be reported monthly by the manufacturer on all sales made in the State of Arkansas to Arkansas wholesalers, retailers, or consumers, and the manufacturer shall remit the tax with each report.

(4)

All additional permit fees and taxes levied by subdivisions (a)(1)(A)-(D) of this section shall be deposited into the State Treasury as general revenues and credited to the State Apportionment Fund. These amounts shall be allocated and transferred to the various funds, fund accounts, and accounts participating in general revenues in the respective proportions to each as provided by law and shall be used for the respective purposes set forth in the Revenue Stabilization Law, §19-5-101 et seq.

(b)(1)

There are levied and there shall be collected as provided by law and rule:

(A)

A tax at the rate of twenty cents (20¢) per case on liquor, cordials, liqueurs, premixed spirituous liquors, and specialties having an alcoholic content of twenty-one percent (21%) or more by weight;

(B)

A tax at the rate of five cents (5¢) per case on liquor, cordials, liqueurs, premixed spirituous liquors, light spirituous liquors, and specialties having an alcoholic content of less than twenty-one percent (21%) alcohol by weight; and

(C)

A tax at the rate of five cents (5¢) per case on sparkling and still wines, including light wines, regardless of alcoholic content.

(2)

These taxes shall be paid by the wholesaler and shall not be passed on by the wholesaler to the retailer or the public. These taxes shall be paid on all such merchandise sold or offered for sale in the State of Arkansas and shall be in addition to any and all other taxes heretofore or hereafter levied and collected on that merchandise.

(3)

All taxes, penalties, fines, and costs received by the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration under the provisions of this subsection shall be deposited into the State Treasury as general revenues to the credit of the State Apportionment Fund. There those amounts shall be allocated to the various funds, fund accounts, and accounts participating in general revenues in the respective proportions to each as provided by law and shall be used for the respective purposes set forth in the Revenue Stabilization Law, §19-5-101 et seq.

(4)

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this subsection shall be guilty of a violation and upon conviction shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500).

History.

Acts 1949, No. 282, §§ 13, 15; 1949, No. 282, § 14, as added by 1953, No. 118, § 36(B), as added by 1971, No. 585, § 12; 1953, No. 385, § 1; 1969, No. 271, § 1; 1969, No. 271, § 2, as added by 1953, No. 118, § 36(C), as added by 1971, No. 585, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-418, 48-419, 48-1213 — 48-1215; Acts 1987, No. 424, §§ 7, 8; 2005, No. 1994, § 33; 2009, No. 294, § 19; 2019, No. 910, § 3334.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment substituted “violation” for “misdemeanor” in (b)(4).

The 2009 amendment, in (a)(1), substituted “four hundred fifty dollars ($450)” for “one hundred dollars ($100)” in (a)(1)(C), and substituted
“nine thousand three hundred dollars ($9,300)” for “three hundred dollars ($300)” in (a)(1)(D).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary” for “Director” in the first sentence of (b)(3).

Cross References.

Native brewery, exemption from tax, §3-5-1408.

Retailers and wholesalers permit fees, §§3-4-604,3-4-605.

Revocation procedure, generally, §§3-2-212 —3-2-217.

3-7-112. Methods of identifying imported liquors.

The Department of Finance and Administration shall, by regulation, establish a method of identifying each case of spirituous liquors to be shipped into Arkansas, prior to such shipment, either by stamps affixed to the cases or by printed evidence of the destination.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 447, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-437.

3-7-113. Distillers and wholesalers — Records.

Distilleries and wholesalers of spirituous liquors shall furnish records as may be required to determine and protect the tax interests of the state.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 447, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-438.

3-7-114. Wholesalers and retailers — Obtaining liquor illegally — Nonpayment of taxes.

(a)

Failure of any wholesaler or retailer to obtain spirituous liquors from sources approved by the state for sale or to pay all taxes due on such liquors shall result in revocation of any alcoholic beverage permit held by the licensee.

(b)

Further, such action shall be deemed to constitute fraud and shall be punishable as such.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 447, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-439.

3-7-115. Sacramental wine.

(a)

All wines sold in the State of Arkansas for use as sacramental wine shall be exempt from all taxes levied on wine by the State of Arkansas.

(b)(1)

Each container of sacramental wine sold in the state shall have attached to it a decal containing the words “Sacramental Wine”.

(2)

The decal shall be provided and attached to the containers by wineries selling sacramental wine in this state.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 902, § 1.

3-7-116. Tax rebate for qualified manufacturers — Definitions.

(a)

For purposes of this section:

(1)

“Barrel” means thirty-one gallons (31 gals.) of liquid;

(2)

“Beer” means any fermented liquor made from malt or any substitute and having an alcoholic content of not more than five percent (5%) by weight;

(3)

“Malt beverage” means any liquor brewed from the fermented juices of grain and having an alcoholic content of not less than five percent (5%) or more than twenty-one percent (21%) by weight;

(4)(A)(i)

“Qualified manufacturer” means a person that manufactures a combined total of less than twenty-five thousand (25,000) barrels of beer and malt beverage during the twelve-month period immediately preceding the twelve-month period for which the rebate under this section is claimed.

(ii)

“Qualified manufacturer” includes a person licensed under §3-5-1201 et seq. or the Arkansas Small Brewery Act, §3-5-1401 et seq.

(B)(i)

The maximum quantity of less than twenty-five thousand (25,000) barrels of beer and malt beverage shall be computed by combining all brands and labels of beer and malt beverage manufactured at all manufacturing facilities owned or controlled by the qualified manufacturer.

(ii)

(a)

The person shall validate its eligibility by furnishing copies of the following forms:

(1)

Brewers Report of Operations (monthly or quarterly) TTB Form (OMB Number 1512-0052); or

(2)

Its equivalent form as submitted to the United States Department of the Treasury.

(b)

The forms shall demonstrate that the combined manufactured barrels of beer and malt beverage are less than twenty-five thousand (25,000) barrels of beer; and

(5)

“Wholesaler” means a person licensed by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division as a wholesaler that purchases beer or malt beverage from a qualified manufacturer.

(b)(1)(A)

A qualified manufacturer is entitled to a tax rebate equal to seven dollars and fifty cents ($7.50) per barrel of beer, malt beverage, or hard cider sold or offered for sale in Arkansas each calendar year by the qualified manufacturer or sold through its appointed wholesalers if the qualified manufacturer or its wholesaler is required to report and pay tax under §3-5-1205(3), §3-5-1408(3), or §3-7-104 on the beer, malt beverage, or hard cider first sold or offered for sale in this state.

(B)

The tax rebate claimed each year by the qualified manufacturer under this section shall not exceed the annual tax liability of the qualified manufacturer and its wholesalers under §3-5-1205(3), §3-5-1408(3), or §3-7-104 during the year requested.

(2)

The first twelve-month period for which a qualified manufacturer may claim a rebate under this section begins January 1, 2007, for the year ending December 31, 2006.

(c)(1)

If a qualified manufacturer under this section expands to produce a combined twenty-five thousand (25,000) barrels or more of beer and malt beverage during a twelve-month period, the qualified manufacturer shall submit a form to the division acknowledging that production has exceeded the limit amount for qualification as a qualified manufacturer.

(2)

A qualified manufacturer that has filed the form required in subdivision (c)(1) of this section may continue to claim the tax rebate under subsection (b) of this section on the first twenty-four thousand nine hundred and ninety-nine (24,999) barrels of beer or malt beverage manufactured during the twelve-month period immediately preceding the twelve-month period for which the rebate under this section is claimed as validated under subdivision (a)(4)(B)(ii) of this section.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 1203, § 1; 2015, No. 857, § 11; 2017, No. 614, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment inserted “§3-5-1205(3)” in (b)(1)(A) and (b)(1)(B).

The 2017 amendment added (c).